2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-tk.pat.txt
??2d1k
r2t1k
??2p1k
l2p1k
l2t1k
g2t1k
n2t1k
r2k1k
r2p1k
k2t1k
r2h1k
s2t1k
l2k1k
w2p1k
n2s1k
r2s1k
l2m1k
??2t1l
??2n1l
??2d1l
r2t1l
??2p1l
l2p1l
l2t1l
g2t1l
n2t1l
r2k1l
r2p1l
k2t1l
r2h1l
s2t1l
l2k1l
w2p1l
n2s1l
r2s1l
l2m1l
??2t1m
??2n1m
??2d1m
r2t1m
??2p1m
l2p1m
l2t1m
g2t1m
n2t1m
r2k1m
r2p1m
k2t1m
r2h1m
s2t1m
l2k1m
w2p1m
n2s1m
r2s1m
l2m1m
??2t1n
??2n1n
??2d1n
r2t1n
??2p1n
l2p1n
l2t1n
g2t1n
n2t1n
r2k1n
r2p1n
k2t1n
r2h1n
s2t1n
l2k1n
w2p1n
n2s1n
r2s1n
l2m1n
??2t1p
??2n1p
??2d1p
r2t1p
??2p1p
l2p1p
l2t1p
g2t1p
n2t1p
r2k1p
r2p1p
k2t1p
r2h1p
s2t1p
l2k1p
w2p1p
n2s1p
r2s1p
l2m1p
??2t1s
??2n1s
??2d1s
r2t1s
??2p1s
l2p1s
l2t1s
g2t1s
n2t1s
r2k1s
r2p1s
k2t1s
r2h1s
s2t1s
l2k1s
w2p1s
n2s1s
r2s1s
l2m1s
??2t1t
??2n1t
??2d1t
r2t1t
??2p1t
l2p1t
l2t1t
g2t1t
n2t1t
r2k1t
r2p1t
k2t1t
r2h1t
s2t1t
l2k1t
w2p1t
n2s1t
r2s1t
l2m1t
??2t1??
??2n1??
??2d1??
r2t1??
??2p1??
l2p1??
l2t1??
g2t1??
n2t1??
r2k1??
r2p1??
k2t1??
r2h1??
s2t1??
l2k1??
w2p1??
n2s1??
r2s1??
l2m1??
??2t1z
??2n1z
??2d1z
r2t1z
??2p1z
l2p1z
l2t1z
g2t1z
n2t1z
r2k1z
r2p1z
k2t1z
r2h1z
s2t1z
l2k1z
w2p1z
n2s1z
r2s1z
l2m1z
??2t1??
??2n1??
??2d1??
r2t1??
??2p1??
l2p1??
l2t1??
g2t1??
n2t1??
r2k1??
r2p1??
k2t1??
r2h1??
s2t1??
l2k1??
w2p1??
n2s1??
r2s1??
l2m1??
s2k1d
l1s2k
l1s2t
s1t2r
n2g1l
n1g2r
s2k1w
